Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.133.050

Use of grants.

The educational assistance grant program for students with dependents grants may be used by eligible participants to attend any public or private college or university in the state of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.92.030(4) (a) and (b) (i) and (ii). Each participating student may receive an amount to be determined by the office of student financial assistance, with a minimum amount of one thousand dollars per academic year, not to exceed the student's documented financial need for the course of study as determined by the institution.

Educational assistance grants for students with dependents are not intended to supplant any grant scholarship or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the office of student financial assistance finds that the educational assistance grants for students with dependents supplant or reduce any grant, scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the office shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of the grant to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.

[ 2013 c 248 s 5; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 238; 2004 c 275 s 74; 2003 c 19 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2013 c 248: See notes following RCW 28B.92.030.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.